Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2971
Conflict of interest.

Except as otherwise provided in section 21-2970, the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act governs
conflicts of interests between a director or member of a committee of the
board of directors and the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 71;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 275.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.